Missouri, session 2026, SB866.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 442.571, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 442.571,
to read as follows:
442.571. 1. Except as provided in sections 442.586
and 442.591, [no alien or foreign business shall acquire by
grant, purchase, devise, descent or otherwise agricultural
land in this state if the total aggregate alien and foreign
ownership of agricultural acreage in this state exceeds one
percent of the total aggregate agricultural acreage in this
state. A sale or transfer of any agricultural land in this
state shall be submitted to the director of the department
of agriculture for review in accordance with subsection 3 of
this section only if there is no completed Internal Revenue
Service Form W-9 signed by the purchaser] beginning August
28, 2026, no alien or foreign business shall acquire by
grant, purchase, devise, descent, or otherwise any
agricultural land in this state. Any alien or foreign
business who acquired any agricultural land in this state
prior to August 28, 2026, shall not grant, sell, or
otherwise transfer such agricultural land to any other alien
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 866 2
or foreign business on or after August 28, 2026. No person
may hold agricultural land as an agent, trustee, or other
fiduciary for an alien or foreign business in violation of
sections 442.560 to 442.592, provided, however, that no
security interest in such agricultural land shall be
divested or invalidated by such violation.
2. Any alien or foreign business who acquires
agricultural land in violation of sections 442.560 to
442.592 remains in violation of sections 442.560 to 442.592
for as long as [he or she] the alien or foreign business
holds an interest in the land, provided, however, that no
security interest in such agricultural land shall be
divested or invalidated by such violation.
3. Subject to the provisions of subsection 1 of this
section, [such] all proposed [acquisitions] transfers on or
after August 28, 2026, by grant, purchase, devise, descent,
or otherwise of any interest in agricultural land held by
any alien or foreign business in this state shall be
submitted to the department of agriculture to determine
whether such [acquisition] transfer of agricultural land is
conveyed in accordance with the [one percent restriction on
the total aggregate] prohibition on alien and foreign
ownership of agricultural land in this state under this
section. The department shall establish by rule the
requirements for submission and approval of requests under
this subsection.
4. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and

SB 866 3
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2014, shall be invalid and void.
✓